Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 2 Agricultural Commodity Commissions Generally

2-8-10.
Nonapplicability of article to Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts, Agricultural Commodity Commission for Equines, Agricultural Commodity Commission for Georgia Grown Products; or Agricultural Commodity Commission for Propane.

This article shall not apply to the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts provided for in Article 3 of this chapter, except as provided in Code Section 2-8-13; nor shall this article apply to the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Equines provided for in Article 5 of this chapter; nor shall this article apply to the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Georgia Grown Products provided for in Article 4 of this chapter; nor shall this article apply to the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Propane provided for in Article 6 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 632, § 1/SB 380; Ga. L. 2013, p. 74, § 2/HB 298; Ga. L. 2019, p. 91, § 2/HB 512.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 18, 2019, added “; nor shall this article apply to the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Propane provided for in Article 6 of this chapter” at the end of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 632, § 2/SB 380, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2006 amendment became effective January 1, 2007, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the November 2006 general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2006, p. 1112) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article, “Agricultural Commodities Promotion,” see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

2-8-11.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Advertising and sales promotion” means, in addition to the ordinarily accepted meaning thereof, trade promotion and activities for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers which restrict the normal flow of agricultural commodities to market and may include the presentation of facts to and negotiations with state, federal, or foreign governmental agencies on matters which affect the marketing of any commodity or commodities included in any marketing order made effective pursuant to this article.

“Agricultural commodity” means any and all agricultural, horticultural, floricultural, and vegetable products produced in this state or any class, variety, or utilization thereof, either in their natural state or as processed by a producer for the purpose of marketing such product or by a processor as defined in this Code section, and shall include any one, any combination thereof, or all of the agricultural products, livestock and livestock products, poultry and poultry products, timber and timber products, fish and seafood, and the products of the farms and forests of this state. For the purpose of this article, the term “agricultural commodity” shall not mean or include peanuts.

“Commission” means each and every agricultural commodity commission created under this article.

“Distributor” means any person who engages in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing an agricultural commodity which he or she has produced or has purchased or acquired from a producer or which he or she is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise, but shall not include a retailer as defined in this Code section, except a retailer who purchases or acquires from, or handles on behalf of, any producer, an agricultural commodity not theretofore subjected to regulation by the marketing order covering such commodity.

“Handler” means any person engaged within this state as a distributor in the business of distributing an agricultural commodity or any person engaged as a processor in the business of processing an agricultural commodity.

“Marketing order” means an order issued pursuant to this article prescribing rules and regulations governing the processing, distributing, or handling in any manner of any agricultural commodity within this state or establishing an assessment for financing the programs established under this article.

“Person” means an individual, firm, corporation, association, or any other business unit or any combination thereof and includes any state agency which engages in any of the commercial activities regulated pursuant to this article.

“Processor” means any person engaged within this state in the operation of receiving, grading, packing, canning, fermenting, distilling, extracting, preserving, grinding, crushing, or changing the form of an agricultural commodity for the purpose of preparing such agricultural commodity for market or of marketing such commodity or engaged in any other activities performed for the purpose of preparing such commodity for market or of marketing such commodity but shall not include a person engaged in manufacturing another and different product from an agricultural commodity, so changed in form. The term “processor” shall not include an agent of the processor nor any person who receives an agricultural commodity for or on the account of another person.

“Producer” means any person engaged within this state in the business of producing or causing to be produced for market any agricultural commodity as defined in this Code section. In the case of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes, such term means a farm winery as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 3-6-21.1.

“Producer marketing” or “marketed by producers” means any or all operations performed by any producer in preparing for market and includes selling, delivering, or disposing of, for commercial purposes, any agricultural commodity which he or she has produced to any handler as defined in this Code section.

“Retailer” means any person who purchases or acquires any agricultural commodity for resale at retail to the general public for consumption off the premises; however, such person shall also be included within the definition of “distributor,” as set forth in this Code section, to the extent that he or she engages in the business of a distributor as defined in this Code section.

“Seasonal marketing regulations” means marketing regulations, applicable to a particular marketing order, made effective as prescribed in this article for the purpose of carrying into effect, by administrative order, the marketing regulatory authorizations and the provisions of such marketing order, as such authorizations or provisions may be applicable to or required by changing economic or marketing conditions and requirements from time to time during each marketing season in which such marketing order may operate. Such seasonal marketing regulations shall not extend beyond the marketing order concerned; nor shall they modify or change the language of such marketing order.

“To distribute” means to engage in the business of a distributor as defined in this Code section.

“To handle” means to engage in the business of a handler as defined in this Code section.

“To process” means to engage in the business of a processor as defined in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 141, § 1A; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 4; Code 1981, § 2-8-3; Code 1981, §

2-8-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 611, § 1/HB 1093; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 2/HB 1428.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 3, 2020, added the last sentence in paragraph (9).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “he or she” for “he” throughout paragraphs (4), (10), and (11).

2-8-12.
Commissioner to administer and enforce article.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to exercise supervisory jurisdiction over the administration and enforcement of this article. In the performance of this duty, he is authorized to utilize the personnel and facilities of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 4; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 5; Code 1981, § 2-8-4; Code 1981, §

2-8-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-13.
Ratification of previously established commissions and establishment of additional commissions; contributions deemed voluntary; balloting to determine continued existence.

Each of the following commissions heretofore established pursuant to the “Georgia Agricultural Commodities Promotion Act,” (Ga. L. 1961, p. 301), as amended, effective from the date set forth below opposite its name, is ratified and confirmed as a public corporation and instrumentality of the State of Georgia from and since such date:

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Milk established July 1, 1961;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Eggs established July 1, 1961;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts established August 1, 1961;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Sweet Potatoes established August 1, 1961;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peaches established May 1, 1962;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Tobacco established July 1, 1962;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Apples established August 1, 1962; and

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Cotton established August 1, 1965.

Each of the following entities that were formed de facto to act as commodity commissions upon presentation by the producers of the affected agricultural commodity of a list of nominees for appointment and on which ex officio members elected by the House Committee on Agriculture and Consumer Affairs and the Senate Agriculture and Consumer Affairs Committee served is ratified and confirmed as a public corporation and instrumentality of the State of Georgia from and since such date:

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Soybeans established September 1, 1971;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Canola established June 24, 1994;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Pecans established June 24, 1994;

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Corn established March 24, 1995; and

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Vegetables established June 19, 2006.

There shall be an Agricultural Commodity Commission for Blueberries established on May 12, 2008.

There shall be an Agricultural Commodity Commission for Ornamental Plants established on May 1, 2009. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “ornamental plants” means any plants grown in commercial nurseries for sale as live plants for use primarily in ornamental or landscape plantings; such term shall not include turf production or plants grown in nurseries for other agricultural, horticultural, or silvicultural use.

There shall be an Agricultural Commodity Commission for Beef established on April 17, 2013. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “beef” means any bovine animal.

There shall be an Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes established on September 1, 2020.

All actions taken by each of the commissions enumerated in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section prior to July 1, 1969, pursuant to terms of Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, as amended, are ratified; and all funds received by each of the commissions after the effective date shown opposite its name and prior to July 1, 1969, are determined to have been voluntarily contributed pursuant to subsection (h) of Code Section 2-8-14 and to constitute trust funds of such commission as provided in Code Section 2-8-17. Each of such commissions shall, from and after July 1, 1969, be organized and constituted, have corporate existence, and possess powers and duties as stated in this article and shall be governed and controlled by this article; provided, however, that any contract obligation or other undertaking entered into or incurred by or in behalf of any such commission prior to July 1, 1969, shall be valid and binding if authorized by Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, as amended.

All actions taken by each of the commissions enumerated in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section prior to May 11, 2007, pursuant to terms of Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, as amended, or this article are ratified; and all funds received by each of the commissions on or after the effective date shown opposite its name and prior to May 11, 2007, are determined to have been voluntarily contributed pursuant to subsection (h) of Code Section 2-8-14 and to constitute trust funds of such commission as provided in Code Section 2-8-17. Each of such commissions shall, from and after May 11, 2007, be organized and constituted, have corporate existence, and possess powers and duties as stated in this article and shall be governed and controlled by this article; provided, however, that any contract obligation or other undertaking entered into or incurred by or in behalf of any such commission prior to May 11, 2007, shall be valid and binding if authorized by Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, as amended, or this article.

Prior to April 30, 1971, and each three years thereafter, balloting shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 2-8-23 to determine whether any existing commission listed in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall continue to exist and operate under this article.

Prior to April 30, 2009, and each three years thereafter, balloting shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 2-8-23 to determine whether any existing commission listed in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall continue to exist and operate under this article.

Prior to April 30, 2010, and each three years thereafter, balloting shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 2-8-23 to determine whether any existing commission listed in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall continue to exist and operate under this article.

Prior to April 30, 2011, and each three years thereafter, balloting shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 2-8-23 to determine whether any existing commission listed in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall continue to exist and operate under this article.

Prior to December 31, 2015, and each three years thereafter, balloting shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 2-8-23 to determine whether any existing commission listed in paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall continue to exist and operate under this article.

Prior to December 31, 2023, and each three years thereafter, balloting shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 2-8-23 to determine whether any existing commission listed in paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall continue to exist and operate under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 8; Code 1981, §

2-8-5

; Code 1981, §

2-8-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 75, § 1/SB 165; Ga. L. 2008, p. 311, § 1/HB 649; Ga. L. 2009, p. 446, §§ 4, 5/SB 152; Ga. L. 2013, p. 65, §§ 1, 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2020, p. 611, § 2/HB 1093.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 3, 2020, added paragraphs (a)(6) and (c)(6).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, in paragraph (b)(2), “May 11, 2007,” was substituted for “the effective date of this paragraph” three times, and “May 11, 2007” for “the effective date of this paragraph” once.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, “May 12, 2008” was substituted for “the effective date of this paragraph” at the end of paragraph (a)(3).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “May 1, 2009” was substituted for “the effective date of the paragraph” in paragraph (a)(4).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2013, “on April 17, 2013” was substituted for “on the effective date of this paragraph” in paragraph (a)(5).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, as amended, referred to in this Code section, was repealed by Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 1, which enacted this article.

2-8-14.
Composition; appointments, terms of office, and compensation; certification; advisory boards, special committees, and personnel; legal representation; acceptance of donations; voting; termination.

Each commission shall be composed of:

The Commissioner of Agriculture, or his or her designee, except as to the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts as created by Article 3 of this chapter, ex officio;

The president of the Georgia Farm Bureau Federation, ex officio;

One member, to serve as an ex officio member of all commissions, elected by the Senate Agriculture and Consumer Affairs Committee with a quorum present and a majority of those present concurring, who shall be a producer of an affected agricultural commodity and shall not be a member of the General Assembly;

One member, to serve as an ex officio member of all commissions, elected by the Agriculture and Consumer Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives with a quorum present and a majority of those present concurring, who shall be a producer of an affected agricultural commodity and shall not be a member of the General Assembly; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c.1) of this Code section, five additional members, who shall be producers of the affected agricultural commodity, to be appointed by the ex officio members of the commission; provided, however, that such additional membership of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Beef shall consist of three beef cattle farmers, one dairy farmer, and one individual involved in the marketing of cattle; and provided, further, that for the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Cotton, the number of additional members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be seven. For the purposes of the appointment of such additional members, the two members elected by each of the agriculture committees of the General Assembly, who shall serve as members of each commission, shall be deemed to be ex officio members.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c.1) of this Code section, members elected by the agriculture committees of the General Assembly shall be elected during each regular session of the General Assembly convening in even-numbered years. Such members shall be selected so that one member is from the northern part of Georgia and one member is from the southern part. For purposes of this selection the northern part of Georgia shall be that area north of and including Richmond, McDuffie, Warren, Hancock, Baldwin, Jones, Bibb, Crawford, Upson, Talbot, and Muscogee counties; and the southern part shall be that area south of such counties. The chairpersons of the Senate and House committees shall by agreement determine which committee shall choose the member from the northern part and which committee shall choose the member from the southern part. Such members shall serve from the date of their election until the election of their successors.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c.1) of this Code section, the appointment of additional members of the commission by the ex officio members thereof, as provided in this Code section, shall be made by them from a list of nominees, submitted by the producers of the affected agricultural commodity, containing the names of double the number of appointments to be made. In the event of a controversy as to the producer group authorized to submit a list of nominees for appointment as members of the commission, the ex officio members shall consider and determine all issues pertaining thereto and upon making their determination shall make the appointments in accordance with such determination. Initial appointments shall be made for three members for a term of three years each from the effective date of their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified and two members for a term of two years each from the effective date of their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Thereafter, successors shall be appointed for a term of three years each from the effective date of their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the ex officio members of the commission, in like manner, for the unexpired term, except that vacancies in the office of a member elected by a legislative committee shall be filled for the unexpired term by the legislative committee which made the previous appointment. Any appointed member shall be eligible for reappointment provided he or she is nominated as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

(c.1) (1)

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes shall also be composed of:

Two members, who shall be producers of wine, appointed by the ex officio members of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes. Said members shall serve initial terms of two years and subsequent terms of three years from the effective date of their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified;

One member appointed by the ex officio members of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes who shall be a producer of wine and shall reside in one of the following counties of this state: Banks, Bartow, Catoosa, Chattooga, Cherokee, Dade, Dawson, Elbert, Fannin, Floyd, Forsyth, Franklin, Gilmer, Gordon, Habersham, Hall, Hart, Jackson, Lumpkin, Madison, Murray, Pickens, Rabun, Stephens, Towns, Union, Walker, White, or Whitfield. In appointing such member, the ex officio members shall consider any recommendations of the board of directors of Georgia Wine Producers, Inc. Such member shall serve a three-year term from the effective date of his or her appointment and until a successor is appointed and qualified;

One member appointed by the ex officio members of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes who shall be a producer of wine and shall reside in one of the following counties of this state: Baldwin, Barrow, Bibb, Bleckley, Bulloch, Burke, Butts, Candler, Carroll, Chattahoochee, Clarke, Clayton, Cobb, Columbia, Coweta, Crawford, DeKalb, Douglas, Effingham, Emanuel, Fayette, Fulton, Glascock, Greene, Gwinnett, Hancock, Haralson, Harris, Heard, Henry, Houston, Jasper, Jefferson, Jenkins, Johnson, Jones, Lamar, Laurens, Lincoln, Macon, Marion, McDuffie, Meriwether, Monroe, Morgan, Muscogee, Newton, Oconee, Oglethorpe, Paulding, Peach, Pike, Polk, Putnam, Richmond, Rockdale, Schley, Screven, Spalding, Talbot, Taliaferro, Taylor, Treutlen, Troup, Twiggs, Upson, Walton, Warren, Washington, Wilkes, or Wilkinson. In appointing such member, the ex officio members shall consider any recommendations of the board of directors of Georgia Wine Producers, Inc. Such member shall serve a three-year term from the effective date of his or her appointment and until a successor is appointed and qualified; and

One member appointed by the ex officio members of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes who shall be a producer of wine and shall reside in one of the following counties of this state: Appling, Atkinson, Bacon, Baker, Ben Hill, Berrien, Brantley, Brooks, Bryan, Calhoun, Camden, Charlton, Chatham, Clay, Clinch, Coffee, Colquitt, Cook, Crisp, Decatur, Dodge, Dooly, Dougherty, Early, Echols, Evans, Glynn, Grady, Irwin, Jeff Davis, Lanier, Lee, Liberty, Long, Lowndes, McIntosh, Miller, Mitchell, Montgomery, Pierce, Pulaski, Quitman, Randolph, Seminole, Stewart, Sumter, Tattnall, Telfair, Terrell, Thomas, Tift, Toombs, Turner, Ware, Wayne, Webster, Wheeler, Wilcox, or Worth. In appointing such member, the ex officio members shall consider any recommendations of the board of directors of Georgia Wine Producers, Inc. Such member shall serve a three-year term from the effective date of his or her appointment and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

The ex officio members who are state officers shall be compensated as provided by law. Each such ex officio member shall be reimbursed by his respective department or from the funds of the commission for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his duties. Each such ex officio member who is a state officer may designate a representative of his department to act for him in performing any duties under this article.

The two members elected by the agriculture committees of the General Assembly, as provided by subsection (a) of this Code section, shall be entitled to receive, for attending meetings of the commission, the same expenses and travel allowances which members of the General Assembly receive for attending meetings of legislative interim committees. Such expenses and allowances shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available to the legislative branch of state government.

The appointed members of the commission and the president of the Georgia Farm Bureau Federation shall receive compensation and reimbursement of expenses as shall be provided by the commission, and such funds shall be payable from the funds of the commission.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to certify to the Secretary of State the membership of each commission and each change in membership as the same occurs.

Each commission is authorized to appoint advisory boards, special committees, and individuals, including technical and clerical personnel, to advise, aid, and assist the commission in the performance of its duties. Compensation for such services shall be fixed by each commission and may be paid from the funds of each commission. The Attorney General shall represent each commission in legal matters and shall be the attorney for each commission. If the Attorney General determines that outside legal counsel is necessary or desirable in connection with any legal matter of the commission, he shall so inform the particular commission involved and, upon approval of the commission, he shall employ such outside counsel. Compensation for such outside counsel shall be agreed upon between such counsel and the Attorney General, subject to the approval of the commission. Such compensation shall be paid from the funds of the commission. Neither Code Section 16-10-9 nor any other law shall prohibit or be applicable to the employment of such counsel.

Any other provision of this article to the contrary notwithstanding, a member of any federation or organization of producers shall be eligible to be appointed as a member of any commission administering this article with respect to any agricultural commodity produced by such federation or organization or handled by it for its members who produce it.

Each commission is authorized to accept donations, gifts, and other property and to use the same for commission purposes. Each commission may exercise the powers and authority conferred by law upon corporations.

The two members elected by the agriculture committees of the General Assembly, as provided by subsection (a) of this Code section, as members of each commission shall be entitled to vote on matters pertaining to the organization of each such commission and upon the selection and nomination of the appointed members of each commission. Such two members shall not be entitled to vote upon any matter pertaining to the policy provisions of the agricultural commodity nor shall they be entitled to vote upon the expenditure of any funds of the commission.

Each commission shall continue as a public corporation and instrumentality of the State of Georgia until abolished by law or until terminated by referendum.

(2)

Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the ex officio members of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes, in like manner, for the unexpired term, except that vacancies in the office of a member elected by a legislative committee shall be filled for the unexpired term by the legislative committee which made the previous appointment. Any appointed member shall be eligible for reappointment provided he or she is nominated as provided in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, §§ 9, 10; Ga. L. 1964, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, §§ 10, 11; Ga. L. 1970, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 568, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 692, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 2; Code 1981, § 2-8-6; Code 1981, §

2-8-14

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 311, § 2/HB 649; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 1/HB 117; Ga. L. 2013, p. 65, § 3/SB 97; Ga. L. 2013, p. 74, § 3/HB 298; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 2/HB 323; Ga. L. 2019, p. 314, § 1/HB 332; Ga. L. 2020, p. 611, § 3/HB 1093.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “appointed member” for “appointive member” in subsection (c) and substituted “appointed members” for “appointive members” in paragraph (d)(3) and subsection (i).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, inserted “or his or her designee, except as to the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts as created by Article 3 of this chapter,” in paragraph (a)(1).

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 3, 2020, substituted “Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c.1) of this Code section, five” for “Five” at the beginning of paragraph (a)(5); substituted “Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c.1) of this Code section, members” for “Members” at the beginning of subsection (b); and, in subsection (c), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c.1) of this Code section, the” for “The” at the beginning of and inserted “or she” at the end of the last sentence; and added subsection (c.1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2013, “and provided, further,” was substituted for “provided, however,” near the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (a)(5).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Agricultural Commodities Promotion,” see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

2-8-15.
Public corporations; corporate powers; chairman; quorum; oath of office; certification of appointments to Secretary of State.

Each commission, with the name of the agricultural commodity annexed thereto, shall be a public corporation and an instrumentality of the State of Georgia. By that name, style, and title, each such commission may contract and be contracted with, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts. Each such commission shall name its chairman and determine a quorum for the transaction of business. Each such commission shall assume the duties and exercise the authority provided in this article without further formality than that provided in this article. Each member of each such commission shall be a public officer and shall take an oath of office faithfully to perform his duties. Such oath shall be administered by the Commissioner or some other person qualified to administer oaths. The fact of a member’s appointment shall be certified to the Secretary of State, who shall issue the appropriate commission under the seal of his office.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 8; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 9; Code 1981, § 2-8-7; Code 1981, §

2-8-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-16.
Funds of commissions — Receipt, collection, and disbursement.

The Commissioner is authorized and it shall be his duty to receive, collect, and disburse the funds of each commission qualifying and operating under this article. He shall disburse funds of any entity created under this article only upon the written authorization of the affected commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 5; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 6; Code 1981, § 2-8-8; Code 1981, §

2-8-16

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-17.
Funds of commissions — Treatment as trust funds.

Funds received by the Commissioner under this article shall be held in trust for the affected commission. Such funds shall be deposited, accounted for, and disbursed in the same manner as the funds of this state but shall not be required to be deposited in the state treasury and appropriated therefrom as are other state funds. It is the express intent and purpose of this article to authorize the receipt, collection, and disbursement by the Commissioner of such funds as trust funds of the affected entity without complying with the requirement applicable to funds collected for the use and benefit of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 6; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 7; Code 1981, § 2-8-9; Code 1981, §

2-8-17

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-18.
Bonds of persons handling funds.

Any person who handles funds under this article shall be bonded with good and sufficient surety in an amount determined by the Commissioner for the accounting of any and all funds coming into his hands.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 26; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 27; Code 1981, §

2-8-10

; Code 1981, §

2-8-18

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-19.
Liability of commission members and employees.

The members and employees of any commission governed by this article and the Commissioner shall not be held responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any producer, processor, distributor, or other handler or to any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of any such commission. The liability of the members of the commission shall be several and not joint and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 21; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 22; Code 1981, §

2-8-11

; Code 1981, §

2-8-19

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-20.
Cooperation with state and federal governmental authorities.

The Commissioner and any commission governed by this article are authorized to confer with and to make any information obtained pursuant to this article available to the duly constituted governmental authorities of this state, of other states, of political subdivisions of this state or other states, and of the United States who, by reason of their duties, have legitimate concern with the subject and to cooperate with all such authorities for the purpose of obtaining administrative uniformity and achieving the objectives of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 15; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 24; Code 1981, §

2-8-12

; Code 1981, §

2-8-20

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.